District of Columbia statutes.
3-1352

Establishment of Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention Commission.

(a)

There is established a Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention Commission.

(b)

The purpose of the Commission is to improve and support motor vehicle theft law enforcement, prosecution, prevention, and community-education programs to reduce the incidence of motor vehicle theft in the District of Columbia. The Commission shall focus on strategies to improve public awareness/prevention, law enforcement, prosecution, and juvenile intervention.

History

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-197, § 3, 55 DCR 6277

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01 and § 3-1351.